Washington statutes.
RCW 44.80.010

Finding—Intent.

The legislature finds that state government should be operated in an efficient and effective manner. It is the intent of the legislature to create the office of legislative support services to make effective and efficient use of the public's resources, improve the delivery and quality of services, standardize practices, and achieve cost savings.

[ 2012 c 113 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 113: "This act takes effect July 1, 2012." [ 2012 c 113 s 8.]